Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.045

Display of license or certification—Availability of photo identification.

(1) A massage therapist licensed under this chapter or a reflexologist certified under this chapter must conspicuously display his or her credential in his or her principal place of business. If the licensed massage therapist or certified reflexologist does not have a principal place of business or conducts business in any other location, he or she must have a copy of his or her credential available for inspection while performing services within his or her authorized scope of practice.

(2) A massage therapist licensed under this chapter or a reflexologist certified under this chapter must have government-issued photo identification on his or her person or have it be available for inspection by city, county, or state law enforcement or department personnel at all times he or she practices massage therapy or reflexology. The name of the massage therapist or reflexologist on the government-issued photo identification must match the name on the massage therapy license or reflexology certification.

[ 2020 c 295 s 1; 2016 c 41 s 5; 2012 c 137 s 7; 2011 c 223 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.